Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership in the Fund

47-7-40.
Eligibility to apply for membership; transfer of Georgia Class Nine Fire Department Pension Fund.

Any person employed as a firefighter or enrolled as a volunteer firefighter is eligible to make application to the board for membership in the fund; provided, however, that no person under a sentence of confinement shall be eligible for membership in the fund while he or she is incarcerated.

Upon becoming a member of the fund, a firefighter or volunteer firefighter shall receive credit only from the date of his or her becoming a member of the fund.

After April 1, 1989, no person who is a member of the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund shall be eligible for membership in the fund by virtue of any employment in or appointment to a position the duties of which qualify such person for membership in the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund.

On and after July 1, 2006, the membership, assets, and administration of the Georgia Class Nine Fire Department Pension Fund created by Chapter 7A of this title shall be transferred to this pension fund, and the Georgia Class Nine Fire Department Pension Fund shall cease to exist as a separate entity. All members so transferred shall receive creditable service for all service credited under such retirement system and shall be entitled to all rights and benefits accorded to members of this retirement system.

Any person who, on June 30, 2006, was an active member of the fund by virtue of holding a position other than as a firefighter, in accordance with the qualifications for membership in effect on that date, shall be entitled to remain a member of the fund; provided, however, that if such person has a break in such position that qualified him or her for membership on June 30, 2006, or any other eligible employment provided by this Code section, for greater than 30 days, that member shall be deemed a suspended member, and any future membership shall be subject to laws and regulations in effect when that member’s application for reinstatement as an active member is approved.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 5; Ga. L. 1956, p. 368, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 241, § 4; Ga. L. 1979, p. 364, § 1A; Ga. L. 1984, p. 990, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1040, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 339, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 476, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 120, § 2/HB 749; Ga. L. 2006, p. 122, § 5/HB 344; Ga. L. 2014, p. 168, § 1/HB 460; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 7/HB 266.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added the proviso in paragraph (a)(1).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of subsection (d) for the former provisions, which read: “Any person who, on June 30, 2006, was an active member of the fund by virtue of holding a position other than as a certified firefighter or a candidate for such certification, in accordance with the qualifications for membership in effect on that date, shall be entitled to remain a member of the fund; provided, however, that if such person has a break in membership any future membership shall be subject to laws and regulations in effect at such time.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, subsection (c), as enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 122, § 5/HB 344, was redesignated as subsection (d).

47-7-41.
Effect of withdrawal of contributions or termination of employment; inactive membership; eligibility for reinstatement; credit for time spent on leave of absence and resumption of payments to fund upon reinstatement as active member.

Any active member who leaves work as a firefighter or volunteer firefighter, and who elects to leave in the fund during such leave from work as a firefighter or voluntary firefighter the dues which the member has theretofore paid, shall, upon application to the board, be entitled to obtain a leave of absence from the fund for a period of not more than two years and shall be deemed an inactive member. An inactive member may apply for additional leaves of absence from the fund every two years. If an inactive member fails to apply for and maintain in effect a leave of absence, the board may treat such failure as an election to withdraw from membership in the fund as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section and Code Section 47-7-105.

An inactive member shall, upon application to the board, be entitled to reinstatement as an active member; provided, however, that upon such application, the applicant meets the requirements set forth in Code Section 47-7-40 as a prerequisite to reinstated active membership. Such a reinstated active member shall be entitled to credit for service rendered before obtaining a leave of absence and after reinstatement but shall not be entitled to credit for any period during such leave of absence.

Any member may at any time elect to withdraw from membership in the fund and upon such withdrawal shall be entitled to a refund of moneys as provided in Code Section 47-7-105, and such member shall be deemed a withdrawn member. Any withdrawn member shall not thereafter be eligible for membership or benefits except upon reinstatement to active membership in accordance with this subsection. Any withdrawn member may make application to the board for reinstatement as an active member. Upon making such application, the applicant must pay to the fund a reinstatement fee of $100.00. An applicant for reinstatement of membership in the fund as provided in this subsection shall not be entitled to such reinstatement unless at the time of such application the applicant meets the requirements set forth in Code Section 47-7-40. Upon reinstatement, such reinstated active member shall be entitled to credit for service rendered after reinstatement as an active member but not for service prior to the date of reinstatement. Any such applicant who fails to satisfy the requirements of reinstatement shall not be entitled to reinstatement as an active member.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 368, § 5; Ga. L. 1968, p. 441, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 364, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 339, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 476, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1449, § 5; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 8/HB 266.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this Code section.

47-7-42.
Application for membership by firemen and volunteer firemen previously not members.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1040, § 3.

47-7-43.
Employees of the fund.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, each regular employee of the fund shall be eligible to join the fund for the purpose of receiving pension benefits only, in like manner as firefighters and volunteer firefighters.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 332, § 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1040, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1.